Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.040

Notice of application to be posted.

Every person intending to apply for a license to keep a ferry at any place shall give notice of his or her intention by posting up at least three notices in public places in the neighborhood where the ferry is proposed to be kept, twenty days prior to any regular session of the board of county commissioners at which the application is to be made.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4087; 1963 c 4 s 36.53.040. Prior: Code 1881 s 3005; 1879 p 61 s 41; 1869 p 281 s 43; 1863 p 522 s 4; 1854 p 354 s 4; RRS s 5465.]